Maine, session 132, LD1099.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§116 is enacted to read:
116. Diapers. Beginning January 1, 2026, sales of disposable and reusable diapers,
including diaper covers, wraps and diaper fasteners that are used with reusable diapers. For
the purposes of this subsection, "diaper" means an absorbent garment worn by humans who
are incapable of or having difficulty controlling their bladders or bowel movements that is
marketed to be worn by adults or children.